apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="złam/ać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ać</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ię</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesz</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iemy</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iecie</l>     <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ią</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iąc</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iąc</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ss/ać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ać</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesz</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iemy</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iecie</l>     <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ij</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ąc</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąc</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="zerw/ać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ać</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesz</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iemy</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iecie</l>     <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ij</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ąc</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąc</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mal/ować__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ować</l>      <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uję</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujesz</l>     <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uje</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujemy</l>     <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujecie</l>    <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ują</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uj</l>        <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>owa</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ując</l>      <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ując</l>      <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owa</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owan</l>      <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owano</l>     <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="namal/ować__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ować</l>      <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uję</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujesz</l>     <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uje</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujemy</l>     <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujecie</l>    <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ują</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uj</l>        <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owa</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owawszy</l>   <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owa</l>       <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owan</l>      <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owano</l>     <r>ować<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="aktywować">       <i>aktyw</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atakować">        <i>atak</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="celebrować">      <i>celebr</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deformować">      <i>deform</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="denerwować">      <i>denerw</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dyktować">        <i>dykt</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="emulować">        <i>emul</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="formułować">      <i>formuł</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="handlować">       <i>handl</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="infiltrować">     <i>infiltr</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="izolować">        <i>izol</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klasyfikować">    <i>klasyfik</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="komunikować">     <i>komunik</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kopiować">        <i>kopi</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kupować">         <i>kup</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="manipulować">     <i>manipul</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nadrukować">      <i>nadruk</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nurkować">        <i>nurk</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="obramować">       <i>obram</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oderwać">         <i>oderw</i><par n="zerw/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="odnotować">       <i>odnot</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opanować">        <i>opan</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pocałować">       <i>pocał</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="podróżować">      <i>podróż</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pogrupować">      <i>pogrup</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="porwać">          <i>porw</i><par n="zerw/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przedefiniować">  <i>przedefini</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przekwalifikować"><i>przekwalifik</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przerwać">        <i>przerw</i><par n="zerw/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przetransportować"><i>przetransport</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przyjmować">      <i>przyjm</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rozchorować">     <i>rozchor</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rwać">            <i>rw</i><par n="ss/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sekundować">      <i>sekund</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skompresować">    <i>skompres</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sprowokować">     <i>sprowok</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ssać">            <i>ss</i><par n="ss/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="szpiegować">      <i>szpieg</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="urwać">           <i>urw</i><par n="zerw/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ustabilizować">   <i>ustabiliz</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="współdecydować" c="FMT:CHECK"><i>współdecyd</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wyczerpać">       <i>wyczerp</i><par n="złam/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wyfiltrować">     <i>wyfiltr</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wypunktować">     <i>wypunkt</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wyrwać">          <i>wyrw</i><par n="zerw/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="włamać">          <i>włam</i><par n="złam/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zaczarować">      <i>zaczar</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zakodować">       <i>zakod</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zakopać">         <i>zakop</i><par n="złam/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zaoferować">      <i>zaofer</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zarejestrować">   <i>zarejestr</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="załamać">         <i>załam</i><par n="złam/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zdegenerować">    <i>zdegener</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zerwać">          <i>zerw</i><par n="zerw/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zidentyfikować">  <i>zidentyfik</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zoperować">       <i>zoper</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="złamać">          <i>złam</i><par n="złam/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="połamać">         <i>połam</i><par n="złam/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wykopać">         <i>wykop</i><par n="złam/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ujmować">         <i>ujm</i><par n="mal/ować__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="podarować">       <i>podar</i><par n="namal/ować__vblex"/></e>
